Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Regional Development

147.580.
Southern Growth Policies Agreement. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 204, § 1; 1980, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

147.585.
Lieutenant Governor to be member of board. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.